Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-23,112
Required disclosure statements.

A local government investment pool shall display and include in all advertising, in all marketing materials, and on any Internet website or mobile application it maintains the following conspicuous statements:

(1) Investments in a local government investment pool are not insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government agency; and

(2) Investments in a local government investment pool are subject to liquidity risk, which may impact the pool's ability to sell investments in a timely fashion or at near face value in order to fulfill a participant's redemption request. Such investments are also subject to market risk, issuer risk, and default risk. Participants may lose money by investing in a local government investment pool.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 34.